Vermont statutes. Title 28 Public Institutions and Corrections
Subchapter 3. Revocation of Probation

§ 301.
Summons or arrest of probationer.

At any time before the discharge of the probationer or the termination of the period of probation:

Summons or warrant for arrest. The court may summon the probationer to appear before it or may issue a warrant for his or her arrest.

Arrest or citation of person on probation. Any correctional officer may arrest a probationer without a warrant if, in the judgment of the correctional officer, the probationer has violated a condition or conditions of his or her probation other than a condition that the probationer pay restitution; or may deputize any other law enforcement officer to arrest a probationer without a warrant by giving him or her a written statement setting forth that the probationer has, in the judgment of the correctional officer, violated a condition or conditions of his or her probation other than a condition that the probationer pay restitution. The written statement delivered with the person by the arresting officer to the supervising officer of the correctional facility to which the person is brought for detention shall be sufficient warrant for detaining him or her. In lieu of arrest, a correctional officer may issue a probationer a citation to appear for arraignment. In deciding whether to arrest or issue a citation, an officer shall consider whether issuance of a citation will reasonably ensure the probationer’s appearance at future proceedings and reasonably protect the public.

No right of action. Any probationer arrested and detained in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall have no right of action against any law enforcement officer, correctional officer, employee of the Department of Corrections, or any other persons because of such arrest and detention.

Detention pending hearing for probationer. Pending arraignment for any charge of violation, the probationer shall be detained at a correctional facility unless issued a citation by a correctional officer. Thereafter, the court may release the probationer pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 7554

. There shall be no right to bail or release, unless the person is on probation for a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony.

Release of certain persons on probation for nonviolent offenses. su

At arraignment, if the court finds that bail or conditions of release will reasonably ensure the probationer’s appearance at future proceedings and conditions of release will reasonably protect the public, the court shall release a probationer who is on probation for a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 7554

.

As used in this section:

“Nonviolent felony” means a felony offense that is not a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

or an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 64.

“Nonviolent misdemeanor” means a misdemeanor offense that is not a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

or an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 64 or

13 V.S.A. § 1030

.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1973, No. 48

, § 2;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 89, eff. April 29, 1998;

1997, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 57

, § 10, eff. July 1, 2004;

2009, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 62

, § 2;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 283.

§ 302.
Notice; hearing.

The court shall not revoke probation without a proceeding conducted in open court. The procedure of such hearing shall include:

the probationer has violated one or more conditions of probation;

aprior written notice to the probationer stating the alleged violation with which he or she is charged and that he or she has a right to legal counsel at the hearing;

the right to legal counsel if requested by the probationer to be assigned by the court in the same manner as in criminal cases;

establishment of the alleged violation by a preponderance of the evidence by the State, if the probationer contests the allegation in open court;

the maintenance of a record of the proceeding, which shall be preserved in such a manner that it can be transcribed as needed.

An order revoking probation shall be appealable in the same manner as would be applicable to his or her original conviction.

The State shall have the right to be represented by counsel in any revocation hearing.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1973, No. 48

, § 3.

§ 303.
Grounds for revocation.

Probation shall not be revoked unless the probationer violates a condition of his or her probation or is convicted of another crime. The violation or conviction shall be both a necessary and a sufficient ground for the revocation of probation.

The court shall not revoke probation and order the confinement of the probationer unless the court finds on the basis of the original offense and the intervening conduct of the probationer that:

confinement is necessary to protect the community from further criminal activity by the probationer;

the probationer is in need of correctional treatment which can most effectively be provided if he or she is confined; or

it would unduly depreciate the seriousness of the violation if probation were not revoked.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 304.
Disposition alternatives upon violation of probation.

If a violation is established by a proceeding conducted in accordance with section 302 of this title, the court may, in its discretion, revoke probation and require the probationer to serve the sentence that was suspended or order that the sentence be served in the community pursuant to the provisions of chapter 6 of this title.

As an alternative to revocation and imposition of sentence as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the court, in its discretion, after a violation has been established, may:

continue the probationer on the existing sentence;

effect, in accordance with subsection 253(b) of this title, necessary or desirable changes or enlargements in the conditions of probation;

conduct a formal or informal conference with the probationer in order to reemphasize to him or her the necessity of compliance with the conditions of probation;

issue a formal or informal warning to the probationer that further violations may result in revocation of probation by the court; or

continue the probationer on the existing sentence, but require the probationer to serve any portion of the sentence.

Prior to ordering either revocation or an alternative sanction for a violation of probation in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the court shall consider, but has complete discretion whether to follow, sanction guidelines established by the Department of Corrections pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

No plea agreement shall limit the court’s discretion under this section.

The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 that establish graduated sanction guidelines for probation violations as an alternative to revocation and imposition of the original sentence. These guidelines do not grant the Department any authority to impose sanctions for probation violations.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1989, No. 291

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2001, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 5, 2002;

2005, No. 63

, § 8.

Particular cases.

Following the establishment of a violation of probation the trial court erred in revoking defendant’s probation and modifying his sentence without obtaining defendant’s waiver. In re Jankowski, 2016 VT 112, 203 Vt. 418, 157 A.3d 573, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 115 (2016).

discretionofcourtparticularcases